Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-501
Sections, how construed.

Sections 43-501 to 43-526 shall be construed to be new, supplemental, and independent legislation upon the subjects of assistance and services for delinquent, dependent, and medically handicapped children, and all provisions of law in regard thereto shall be and remain in full force and effect.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 1, p. 180;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-501;

R.S.1943, § 43-501;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 25.